Hawaii statutes.
§437B-24 Certification required for
mechanics prior to [licensure]. (a) Except as provided in subsection (b)
below, every mechanic applying for [licensure] shall have passed the
appropriate certification test provided for in this chapter.

(b) Notwithstanding any provision of this
chapter, any person who has been engaged as a motor vehicle mechanic for a
period of at least two years prior to January 1, 1976, and who has applied for
[licensure] as a motor vehicle mechanic under this chapter on or before June
30, 1976, shall not be required to take the certification test prescribed in
this chapter prior to [licensure]. [L 1975, c 143, pt of §2; am L 1998, c 199,
§8]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next